Utah statutes.
62A-7-403.   Care of pregnant youth offender.

(1)  When a youth offender in a secure facility is pregnant, the division shall ensure that adequate prenatal and postnatal care is provided, and shall place her in an accredited hospital before delivery.  As soon as her condition after delivery will permit, the youth offender may be returned to the secure facility.

(2)  If the division has concern regarding the youth offender's fitness to raise her child, the division shall petition the juvenile court to hold a custody hearing.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 13, 2005 General Session

